Utah statutes.
72-10-303.   Submission of requests for aid -- Approval by division -- Receipt and disbursement of funds.

(1)  The state, a county, municipality, or airport authority may not submit to any federal agency or department of the United States any requests for aid under any act of congress that provides funds for airports or commercial airport construction, development, expansion, or improvements, unless the project and the requests for aid have been first approved by the division.

(2)  The state, a county, municipality, or airport authority may not directly accept, receive, receipt for, or disburse any funds granted by the United States under the act, but it shall designate the division as its agent and in its behalf to accept, receive, receipt for, and disburse the funds.

(3)  The state, a county, municipality, or airport authority shall enter into an agreement with the division, prescribing the terms and conditions of the agency in accordance with federal laws, rules, and regulations and applicable laws of this state.

(4)  Money paid by the United States government shall be retained by the state or paid to a county, municipality, or airport authority under terms and conditions imposed by the United States government in making the grant.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

